test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - mekanisera: # 
    mekanisera+V+Inf: mekanisera
    mekanisera+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mekaniserar
    mekanisera+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: mekaniseraði
    mekanisera+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: mekaniseraðu
    mekanisera+V+Sup: mekaniserað
    mekanisera+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: mekaniseraður
